apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="суп__n">
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="прав/о__n">
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="вік/но__n">
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ну</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ном</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <!--по--><e r="LR"><p><l>ну</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>но</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>он</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нам</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нами</l>       <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нах</l>        <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>на</l>         <r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/око__n">
  <e>       <p><l>око</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ока</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оку</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>око</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оком</l>        <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>оці</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>око</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очі</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очей</l>        <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очам</l>        <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очі</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>вічі</l>        <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очима</l>       <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очах</l>        <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>очі</l>         <r>око<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="аболіціонізм__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="академізм">       <i>академізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="альбінізм">       <i>альбінізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="аморфізм">        <i>аморфізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="анахронізм">      <i>анахронізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="антиклерикалізм"> <i>антиклерикалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="антиінтелектуалізм"><i>антиінтелектуалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="арабізм">         <i>арабізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="блок">            <i>блок</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="біологізм">       <i>біологізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="вокалізм">        <i>вокалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="гегемонізм">      <i>гегемонізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="германізм">       <i>германізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="гомеоморфізм">    <i>гомеоморфізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="гіперболізм">     <i>гіперболізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="демонізм">        <i>демонізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="дерево">          <i>дерев</i><par n="прав/о__n"/></e>
<e lm="диморфізм">       <i>диморфізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="дуалізм">         <i>дуалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="екзистенціалізм"> <i>екзистенціалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="екстремізм">      <i>екстремізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="ендемізм">        <i>ендемізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="зооморфізм">      <i>зооморфізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="катаклізм">       <i>катаклізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="колоніалізм">     <i>колоніалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="комізм">          <i>комізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="конформізм">      <i>конформізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="крипторхізм">     <i>крипторхізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="легітимізм">      <i>легітимізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="макаронізм">      <i>макаронізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="матеріалізм">     <i>матеріалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="месіанізм">       <i>месіанізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="модернізм">       <i>модернізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="монізм">          <i>монізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="мутуалізм">       <i>мутуалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="нативізм">        <i>нативізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="неовіталізм">     <i>неовіталізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="неоплатонізм">    <i>неоплатонізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="неофеодалізм">    <i>неофеодалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="нонконформізм">   <i>нонконформізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="онанізм">         <i>онанізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="орієнталізм">     <i>орієнталізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="панлогізм">       <i>панлогізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="панісламізм">     <i>панісламізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="парахронізм">     <i>парахронізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="песимізм">        <i>песимізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="позитивізм">      <i>позитивізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="популізм">        <i>популізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="право">           <i>прав</i><par n="прав/о__n"/></e>
<e lm="провінціалізм">   <i>провінціалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="псевдоморфізм">   <i>псевдоморфізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="релятивізм">      <i>релятивізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="сексуалізм">      <i>сексуалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="снобізм">         <i>снобізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="сталінізм">       <i>сталінізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="суп">             <i>суп</i><par n="суп__n"/></e>
<e lm="термотропізм">    <i>термотропізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="уніонізм">        <i>уніонізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="формалізм">       <i>формалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="шовінізм">        <i>шовінізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="імморалізм">      <i>імморалізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="інтуїтивізм">     <i>інтуїтивізм</i><par n="аболіціонізм__n"/></e>
<e lm="око">             <i></i><par n="/око__n"/></e>
<e lm="вікно">           <i>вік</i><par n="вік/но__n"/></e>
